District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.17

Use of land in squares 354 and 355 for Southwest Freeway and for redevelopment of Southwest area of District.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized to use the land in squares 354 and 355 in the District of Columbia, and the water frontage on the Washington Channel of the Potomac River lying south of Maine Avenue between 11th and 12th Streets, including the buildings and wharves thereon, for the proposed Southwest Freeway and Washington Channel approaches thereto, and for the redevelopment of the Southwest area of the District of Columbia pursuant to authority contained in subchapter I of Chapter 3 of Title 6.

History

Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 983, Pub. L. 85-821

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-133.
1973 Ed., § 7-134.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.